Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.140

Schools with special standards—Dress codes.

(1) School district boards of directors may establish schools or programs which parents may choose for their children to attend in which: (a) Students are required to conform to dress and grooming codes, including requiring that students wear uniforms; (b) parents are required to participate in the student's education; or (c) discipline requirements are more stringent than in other schools in the district.

(2) School district boards of directors may establish schools or programs in which: (a) Students are required to conform to dress and grooming codes, including requiring that students wear uniforms; (b) parents are regularly counseled and encouraged to participate in the student's education; or (c) discipline requirements are more stringent than in other schools in the district. School boards may require that students who are subject to suspension or expulsion attend these schools or programs as a condition of continued enrollment in the school district.

(3) If students are required to wear uniforms in these programs or schools, school districts shall accommodate students so that the uniform requirement is not an unfair barrier to school attendance and participation.

(4) Nothing in this section impairs or reduces in any manner whatsoever the authority of a board under other law to impose a dress and appearance code. However, if a board requires uniforms under such other authority, it shall accommodate students so that the uniform requirement is not an unfair barrier to school attendance and participation.

(5) School district boards of directors may adopt dress and grooming code policies which prohibit students from wearing gang-related apparel. If a dress and grooming code policy contains this provision, the school board must also establish policies to notify students and parents of what clothing and apparel is considered to be gang-related apparel. This notice must precede any disciplinary action resulting from a student wearing gang-related apparel.

(6) School district boards of directors may not adopt a dress and grooming code policy which precludes students who participate in nationally recognized youth organizations from wearing organization uniforms on days that the organization has a scheduled activity or prohibit students from wearing clothing in observance of their religion.

[ 1997 c 266 s 14; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 612.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1997 c 266: See notes following RCW 28A.600.455.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.